Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB595.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 413.249 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Childhood sexual assault or abuse" means an act or series of acts against a
person less than eighteen (18) years old and that[which] meets the criteria
defining a misdemeanor or felony in:
1. KRS Chapter 510;
2. KRS 529.040 when the defendant advances or profits from the
prostitution of a minor;
3. KRS 529.100 when the offense involves commercial sexual activity;
4. KRS 529.110 when the offense involves commercial sexual activity;
5. KRS 530.020 or 530.064(1)(a);
6. KRS Chapter 531 involving a minor or depiction of a minor; or
7. KRS 506.010 or 506.030 for attempt to commit or solicitation to commit
any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to 6. of this paragraph.
No prior criminal prosecution or conviction of the civil defendant for the act
or series of acts shall be required to bring a civil action for redress of
childhood sexual assault or abuse;
(b) "Entity" means a firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, association,
or any private or public entity, including the Commonwealth, a city, county,
urban-county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or
charter county government, or any of their agencies, departments, or any KRS
58.180 nonprofit nonstock corporation; and
(c) "Injury or illness" means either a physical or psychological injury or illness.
(2) A civil action for recovery of damages for injury or illness suffered as a result of
childhood sexual assault or abuse is not subject to a period of limitations and may
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 3:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1214
be commenced at any time[shall be brought within ten (10) years after the victim
attains the age of eighteen (18) years.
(3) The time period set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to a civil
action for recovery of damages for injury or illness] against:
(a) A person alleged to have committed the act of childhood sexual assault or
abuse; or
(b) An entity that owed a duty of care to the plaintiff, where a wrongful or
negligent act by an employee, officer, director, official, volunteer,
representative, or agent of the entity was a legal cause of the childhood sexual
assault or abuse that resulted in the injury or illness to the plaintiff.
(3)[(4)] The complaint shall be accompanied by a motion to seal the record and the
complaint shall immediately be sealed by the clerk of the court. The complaint shall
remain sealed until:
(a) The court rules upon the motion to seal;
(b) Any motion to dismiss under CR 12.02 is ruled upon, and if the complaint is
dismissed, the complaint and any related papers or pleadings shall remain
sealed unless opened by a higher court; or
(c) The defendant files an answer and a motion to seal the record upon grounds
that a valid factual defense exists, to be raised in a motion for summary
judgment pursuant to CR 56. The record shall remain sealed by the clerk until
the court rules upon the defendant's motion to close the record. If the court
grants the motion to close, the record shall remain sealed until the defendant's
motion for summary judgment is granted. The complaint, motions, and other
related papers or pleadings shall remain sealed unless opened by a higher
court.
(4)[(5)] A victim of childhood sexual assault or abuse shall not have a cause of action
against a third party, unless the third party failed to act as a reasonable person or
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 3:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1214
entity in complying with their duties to the victim.
(5)[(6)] (a) Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege,
except the attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for
excluding evidence regarding childhood sexual assault or abuse or the cause
thereof when an exception to the Kentucky Rules of Evidence is met, in any
judicial proceeding. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal
proceeding in District or Circuit Court regarding childhood sexual assault or
abuse.
(b) As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the clergy-penitent privilege is
limited to information received solely through confidential communications
with a clergy member, privately or in a confessional setting, when in the
course of the discipline or practice of the clergy member's church,
denomination, or organization, he or she is authorized or accustomed to
hearing those communications, and under the discipline, tenets, customs, or
practices of his or her church, denomination, or organization, has a duty to
keep those communications secret.
(6)[(7)] (a) As was its intention with the passage of 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 114, sec. 2,
the General Assembly hereby states that the amendments enacted in 2017 Ky.
Acts ch. 114, sec. 2 shall be applied retroactively to actions accruing before its
effective date of June 29, 2017. This section is a remedial statute which is to
be given the most liberal interpretation to provide remedies for victims of
childhood sexual assault or abuse.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any claim for childhood
sexual assault or abuse that was barred as of March 23, 2021, because the
applicable statute of limitations had expired is hereby revived, and the action
may be brought if commenced within five (5) years of the date on which the
applicable statute of limitations expired.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 3:09 PM Jacketed